Hawaii statutes.
§10-9 Salaries; benefit; expenses.
Members of the board:

(1) Shall receive an annual salary which shall be
paid:

(A) Exclusively from revenue under section
10-13.5; and

(B) In equal amounts, beginning with the
first pay period for state employees in November of the year the member of the
board is elected.

Effective July 1, 1993, and until the salary
commission makes recommendations for salary, the salary of the chairperson of
the board shall be $37,000 a year and the salary of other members of the board
shall be $32,000 a year. Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding,
all members of the board shall be included in any benefit program generally
applicable to officers and employees of the State;

(2) Shall be allowed transportation fares between
islands and abroad;

(3) Shall be allowed personal expenses at the rates
specified by the board while attending board meetings or while on official
business as authorized by the chairperson, when those board meetings or
official business shall require a member to leave the island upon which the
member resides; and

(4) Shall be allowed a protocol allowance to cover
expenses incurred in the course of a member's duties and responsibilities. [L
1979, c 196, pt of §2; am L 1981, c 148, §1; am L 1989, c 290, §1; am L 1993, c
358, §3; am L 2002, c 148, §1 and c 183, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next